Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-202
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Game Law, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 37-203 to 37-247.01 are used.

Laws 1929, c. 112, I, § 1, p. 407;

C.S.1929, § 37-101;

Laws 1931, c. 75, § 1, p. 199;

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 1, p. 290;

Laws 1941, c. 72, § 1, p. 300;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-101;

Laws 1943, c. 94, § 1, p. 321;

R.S.1943, § 37-101;

Laws 1949, c. 100, § 1, p. 275;

Laws 1953, c. 123, § 1, p. 386;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 1, p. 464;

Laws 1959, c. 148, § 2, p. 563;

Laws 1963, c. 200, § 1, p. 647;

Laws 1965, c. 194, § 1, p. 592;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 1, p. 578;

Laws 1971, LB 733, § 8;

Laws 1973, LB 331, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 195, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 142, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 557, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 154, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 201;

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 57;

Laws 1994, LB 1088, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 259, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 173, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 37-101;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB391, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB374, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 2.